Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 2. State Health Insurance Plans.

Sec. 21.55.100.
Types of insurance plans.

The association shall make available to a person who is eligible for coverage under this chapter at least one individual state plan of health insurance. The association shall offer a plan with the deductible, copayment, and calendar year maximum limits as described in AS

21.55.120

and may offer additional deductible, copayment, and calendar year maximum limits as approved by the director.

The association may make available to residents who are high risks, eligible for and covered by Medicare, 65 years of age or older, and eligible under this chapter one or more Medicare supplement plans that meet the minimum policy standards and minimum benefit standards established by regulations adopted by the director under AS

21.96.060

.

The association may not refuse to offer coverage under a state plan to a person who is eligible under this chapter. The association may not refuse coverage under a state plan to a person who is eligible under this chapter, applies for coverage, and pays the required premium.

The association may make available to a person eligible under this chapter coverage through a health maintenance organization or other managed care arrangement if approved by the director. Deductible, copayment, and calendar year maximum limits provided through an organization or arrangement are not subject to the limits described in AS

21.55.120

, but the limits must be approved by the director.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 125 SLA 1994; am §§ 60 — 62 ch 81 SLA 1997; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 31 SLA 1999; am § 20 ch 30 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in subsection (b), “AS

21.96.060

” was substituted for “AS 21.89.060” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS 21.89.060.

Sec. 21.55.110.
Minimum benefits of state health insurance plan.

Except as provided in AS

21.55.120

—

21.55.140

, the minimum standard benefits of a health insurance plan offered under AS

21.55.100(a)

shall be benefits with a lifetime maximum of $1,000,000 for each individual for usual, customary, reasonable, or prevailing charges or, when applicable, the allowance agreed upon between a provider and the plan administrator for charges. The minimum standard benefits of the plan must cover the following medical services performed for an individual covered by the plan for the diagnosis or treatment of nonoccupational disease or nonoccupational injury:

hospital services;

subject to the limitations of AS

21.36.090(d)

, professional services that are rendered by a physician or by a registered nurse at the physician’s direction, other than services for mental or dental conditions;

the diagnosis or treatment of mental conditions, as defined in regulations of the director, rendered during the year on other than an inpatient basis, up to a yearly maximum benefit of $4,000;

legend drugs requiring a physician’s prescription;

services of a skilled nursing facility for not more than 120 days in a policy year;

home health agency services up to a maximum of 270 visits in a calendar year if the services commence within seven days following confinement in a hospital or skilled nursing facility of at least three consecutive days for the same condition, except that in the case of an individual diagnosed by a physician as terminally ill with a prognosis of six months or less to live, the home health agency services may commence irrespective of whether the covered person was previously confined or, if the covered person was confined, irrespective of the seven-day period, and the yearly benefit for medical social services may not exceed $200;

hospice services for up to six months in a calendar year;

use of radium or other radioactive materials;

outpatient chemotherapy;

oxygen;

anesthetics;

nondental prosthesis and maxillo-facial prosthesis used to replace any anatomic structure lost during treatment for head and neck tumors or additional appliances essential for the support of the prosthesis;

rental, or purchase if purchase is more cost effective than rental, of durable medical equipment that has no personal use in the absence of the condition for which it was prescribed;

diagnostic x-rays and laboratory tests;

oral surgery for excision of partially or completely unerupted impacted teeth or excision of a tooth root without the extraction of the entire tooth;

services of a licensed physical therapist rendered under the direction of a physician;

transportation by a local ambulance operated by licensed or certified personnel to the nearest health care institution for treatment of the illness or injury and round trip transportation by air to the nearest health care institution for treatment of the illness or injury if the treatment is not available locally; if the patient is a child under 12 years of age, the transportation charges of a parent or legal guardian accompanying the child may be paid if the attending physician certifies the need for the accompaniment;

confinement in a licensed or certified facility established primarily for the treatment of alcohol or drug abuse, or in a part of a hospital used primarily for this treatment, for a period of at least 45 days within any calendar year;

alternatives to inpatient services as defined by the association in the state plan benefits;

second surgical opinions;

other services that are medically necessary in the treatment or diagnosis of an illness or injury as may be designated or approved by the director.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992; am § 5 ch 31 SLA 1999)

Sec. 21.55.120.
Deductibles and copayments.

A state plan other than a Medicare supplement plan may require a deductible of not less than $500 a person as determined by the board and approved by the director. The amount of the deductible may not be greater when a service is rendered on an outpatient basis than when that service is offered on an inpatient basis. Expenses incurred during the last three months of a calendar year and actually applied to an individual’s deductible for that year shall also be applied to that individual’s deductible in the following calendar year.

A state plan other than a Medicare supplement plan shall require a maximum copayment of 20 percent for charges for all types of health care in excess of the deductible and 50 percent for services described in AS

21.55.110

(3) in excess of the deductible.

The sum of the deductible and copayments required in any calendar year under a plan may not exceed a maximum limit of $1,500 plus the deductible. Covered expenses incurred after the applicable maximum limit has been reached shall be paid at the rate of 100 percent of usual, customary, reasonable, or prevailing charges, except that expenses incurred for treatment of mental and nervous conditions shall be paid at the rate of 50 percent.

[Repealed, § 24 ch 31 SLA 1999.]

[Repealed, § 24 ch 31 SLA 1999.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992; am §§ 4, 5 ch 125 SLA 1994; am §§ 6, 7, 24 ch 31 SLA 1999)

Sec. 21.55.130.
Preexisting conditions.

A preexisting condition exclusion in a state plan may not exclude coverage of a preexisting condition unless

the condition first manifested itself within the period of three months immediately before the effective date of coverage in a manner that would cause a reasonably prudent person to seek diagnosis, care, or treatment; or

medical advice or treatment was recommended or received within the period of three months immediately before the effective date of coverage.

A policy may not exclude coverage for a loss due to preexisting conditions for a period greater than six months following the effective date of coverage.

A state plan issued to a person whose previous subscriber contract, health policy, or Medicare supplement policy was involuntarily terminated shall credit the time covered under the previous contract or policy toward an exclusion for preexisting conditions under the state plan if the previous contract or policy had a similar preexisting condition exclusion and the person applies for a state plan within 31 days after termination of the previous contract or policy. If a person covered by this subsection is accepted by the plan administrator and pays a specified premium for retroactive coverage, the state plan is effective retroactively to the date that the person’s previous contract or policy terminated.

A state plan issued to a federally defined eligible individual may not impose a preexisting condition exclusion.

A state plan issued to a qualified TAA eligible individual may not impose a preexisting condition exclusion.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992; am § 63 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 8 ch 31 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 102 SLA 2003)

Sec. 21.55.140.
Care and services not covered.

A state plan may not provide benefits for charges for the following:

care for an injury or disease either

arising out of and in the course of an employment subject to a workers’ compensation or similar law or where the benefit is available to be provided under a workers’ compensation policy or equivalent self-insurance to a sole proprietor, business partner, or corporation officer; or

to the extent benefits are payable without regard to fault under a coverage statutorily required to be contained in a motor vehicle or other liability insurance policy or equivalent self-insurance;

treatment for cosmetic purposes other than surgery for the prompt repair of an accidental injury sustained while covered or for replacement of an anatomic structure removed during treatment of tumors;

travel, other than transportation covered under AS

21.55.110

(17);

private room accommodations to the extent it is in excess of the institution’s most common charge for a semiprivate room;

services or articles to the extent that the charge exceeds the reasonable charge in the locality for the service;

services or articles that are determined not to be medically necessary, except for the fabrication or placement of the prosthesis as specified in AS

21.55.110

(12) and (2) of this subsection;

services or articles that are not within the scope of the license or certificate of the institution or individual rendering the services or articles;

services or articles furnished, paid for, or reimbursed directly by or under any law of a government, except as otherwise provided in this chapter;

services or articles for custodial care or designed primarily to assist an individual in the activities of daily living;

service charges that would not have been made if no insurance existed or that the covered individual is not legally obligated to pay;

eyeglasses, contact lenses, or hearing aids or the fitting of them;

dental care not specifically covered by this chapter;

services of a registered nurse who ordinarily resides in the covered individual’s home, or who is a member of the covered individual’s family or the family of the covered individual’s spouse;

experimental procedures, except during an approved clinical trial; in this paragraph, “approved clinical trial” has the meaning given in AS

21.42.415

; and

services and supplies for which the patient was not charged.

[Repealed, § 8 ch 102 SLA 2003.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992; am § 8 ch 102 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 117 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (a)(6), “subsection” was substituted for “section” to correct a manifest error in ch. 126, SLA 1992.

Sec. 21.55.150.
State plan premiums.

The association may not charge a rate for coverage issued by or through the association that is unfairly discriminatory. The board shall submit premium rates to the director for approval before use.

The association may use separate scales of premium rates based on age and geographic location of the insured. The association may use separate scales of premium rates based on other factors, including use or nonuse of tobacco, if approved by the director.

The board shall determine standard risk premium rates by considering the premium rates charged by members of the association offering, to residents of the state, health insurance benefits substantially equivalent to benefits under the state plan. The premium for a state plan may not exceed 150 percent of the standard risk premium rates determined by the board.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992; am § 6 ch 125 SLA 1994; am § 9 ch 31 SLA 1999; am § 2 ch 102 SLA 2003)